North Carolina, session 2025, HB180.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 3 of Chapter 143C of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 143C-3-4.1. Long-term budget assessment.
The Director shall collaborate annually with the legislative branch to create and update a
long-term budget assessment and consensus revenue forecast covering at least the following five
years and which shall include at least the following:
(1) A projection of spending required to maintain current services and programs
in the context of changes to the cost of delivering services, including inflation
and changes to the size of the population and the population served.
(2) An analysis of the cost of program changes or policies to be enacted as well
as those mandated by statute or the courts that may not have been included in
the base year.
(3) An analysis of the cost to the State for maintaining or increasing employee
salaries and benefits to reflect current economic factors, including inflation
and benefit cost increases.
(4) A comparison of potential impacts on the State budget based upon fiscal
scenarios related to economic performance, changes to transfers from the
federal government, or both."
SECTION 2. G.S. 143C-3-5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143C-3-5. Budget recommendations and budget message.
(a) Budget Proposals. – The Governor shall present budget recommendations, consistent
with G.S. 143C-3-1, 143C-3-2, and 143C-3-3 143C-3-3, and 143C-3-4.1 to each regular session
of the General Assembly at a mutually agreeable time to be fixed by joint resolution.
…
(f) Budget Message. – The Governor's budget recommendations shall be accompanied
by a written budget message that does all of the following:
(1) Explains the goals embodied in the recommended budget.
(2) Explains important features of the activities anticipated in the budget.
(3) Explains the assumptions underlying the statement of revenue availability.
*H180-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) Sets forth the reasons for changes from the previous biennium or fiscal year,
as appropriate, in terms of programs, program goals, appropriation levels, and
revenue yields.
(5) Identifies anticipated sources of funding for major spending initiatives.
(6) Prepares a fiscal analysis that addresses the State's budget outlook for the
upcoming five-year period. period, consistent with the assessment required
under G.S. 143C-3-4.1. This fiscal analysis shall include detailed estimates
for five years for any proposals to create new or significantly expand programs
and for proposals to create new or change existing law.
…."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to the adoption
of the Current Operations Appropriations Act for the fiscal year beginning on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 180-First Edition